Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) To the extent practicable, each county auditor shall schedule the following meetings with each federally recognized Indian tribe located in whole or in part within the county:(a) Not later than August 1st of each odd-numbered year, a meeting to discuss the details for the next regularly scheduled election cycle. Such a meeting may address, without limitation:(i) The establishment and operation of voting centers or ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation and the size requirements for any such voting centers or ballot drop boxes;(ii) The dates and times of the upcoming elections for which voting centers or ballot drop boxes may be established;(iii) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled election cycle for the federally recognized Indian tribe to submit a request for the establishment of voting centers or ballot drop boxes;(iv) Responsibilities for the recruitment of election officers; and(v) Any other information relating to the establishment and operation of voting centers and ballot drop boxes;(b) Not later than September 1st of each odd-numbered year, a meeting to confirm any details relating to the establishment and operation of voting centers or ballot drop boxes. Such a meeting may address, without limitation:(i) Whether the federally recognized Indian tribe will request or has requested to establish any voting centers or ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation and the size requirements for any such voting centers and ballot drop boxes;(ii) The days and hours of any voting center or ballot drop box established within an Indian reservation;(iii) Election officers for any voting center or ballot drop box established within an Indian reservation; and(iv) The deadlines relating to the next regularly scheduled election cycle for the federally recognized Indian tribe to submit a request for the establishment of voting centers or ballot drop boxes; and(c) A meeting on an ongoing basis during the year of an election if a federally recognized Indian tribe elects to establish any voting centers or ballot drop boxes within an Indian reservation.(2) If a county auditor:(a) Is unable to make contact with a federally recognized Indian tribe to carry out the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the county auditor shall contact the secretary of state to facilitate contact; or(b) Has not contacted a federally recognized Indian tribe, a representative of the federally recognized Indian tribe may contact the secretary of state to facilitate contact.(3) The tribal liaison designated by the secretary of state may assist the county auditor or a federally recognized Indian tribe to facilitate any contact required pursuant to this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Each biennium, the secretary of state must meet with the federally recognized Indian tribes of the state to provide a forum for discussing and addressing barriers to voting, including but not limited to:(1) Education and outreach tools for tribal voters;(2) The use of tribal identification card data for online voter registration;(3) Assistance with tribal-led voter registration drives;(4) Establishment of ballot mailing sites on tribal land for voters with nontraditional mailing addresses;(5) Installation of ballot drop boxes on or near tribal lands;(6) Providing students with information about voting and opportunities to register or preregister to vote;(7) Personalized voter registration links, emails with election date reminders, and meetings or presentations on various elections topics; and(8) Any other policy issues or tribal concerns.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The secretary of state may, within existing resources, study the feasibility of employing an electronic ballot portal that enables covered voters to return a voted ballot.(2) Any electronic ballot portal design being studied must:(a) Be secure against electronic monitoring and incursion or interference;(b) Provide the maximum level of voter secrecy and privacy available;(c) Ensure that only a single vote is cast by any voter authorized to use the electronic ballot portal to return a voted ballot;(d) Have the capability to produce an auditable paper record at the receiving end; and(e) Authorize only covered voters to return a voted ballot.(3) In studying electronic ballot portal designs, the secretary of state may rely on the results of independent design, engineering, and performance evaluations as well as contract or consult with experts such as county auditors, representatives with expertise in electronic voting methods, and cybersecurity experts.(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize the use of an electronic ballot portal to return a voted ballot in this state.(5) If the secretary of state conducts a feasibility study in accordance with this section, the secretary of state shall, within 180 days of completing the study and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, provide the appropriate committees of the legislature with a report of the results of its feasibility study and any recommendations on whether the state should employ an electronic ballot portal for use in elections in this state.(6) For purposes of this section, "covered voter" means:(a) Service voters as defined in RCW 29A.04.163;(b) Overseas voters as defined in RCW 29A.04.109;(c) Disabled voters as defined in RCW 29A.04.037; and(d) Any elector who is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe and resides on an Indian reservation.(7) This section expires 30 days after the secretary of state submits its report to the legislature described in subsection (5) of this section. The secretary of state must provide written notice of the expiration date of this section to affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the secretary of state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise."Federally recognized Indian tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington as described in RCW 43.376.010.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 29A RCW.--- END ---